Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-686
Injured person; remedies available.

Any owner of an estate or interest in or concerning land or water, except a person who has signed an agreement filed with the Chief Water Officer pursuant to section 46-682, may bring an action for damages or injunctive or other relief for any injury done to his or her land or water rights by the holder of a permit issued pursuant to section 46-683. Nothing in the Industrial Ground Water Regulatory Act shall be construed as limiting the right to resort to other means of review, redress, or relief provided by law.

Laws 1981, LB 56, § 12;

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 77;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 200.